Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.479

Emergency adjudicative proceedings.

(1) Unless otherwise provided by law, an agency may use emergency adjudicative proceedings in a situation involving an immediate danger to the public health, safety, or welfare requiring immediate agency action.

(2) The agency may take only such action as is necessary to prevent or avoid the immediate danger to the public health, safety, or welfare that justifies use of emergency adjudication.

(3) The agency shall enter an order, including a brief statement of findings of fact, conclusions of law, and policy reasons for the decision if it is an exercise of the agency's discretion, to justify the determination of an immediate danger and the agency's decision to take the specific action.

(4) The agency shall give such notice as is practicable to persons who are required to comply with the order. The order is effective when entered.

(5) After entering an order under this section, the agency shall proceed as quickly as feasible to complete any proceedings that would be required if the matter did not involve an immediate danger.

(6) The agency record consists of any documents regarding the matter that were considered or prepared by the agency. The agency shall maintain these documents as its official record.

(7) Unless otherwise required by a provision of law, the agency record need not constitute the exclusive basis for agency action in emergency adjudicative proceedings or for judicial review thereof.

(8) This section shall not apply to agency action taken pursuant to a provision of law that expressly authorizes the agency to issue a cease and desist order. The agency may proceed, alternatively, under that independent authority.

[ 1988 c 288 s 424.]

NOTES:

Designation of persons for emergency adjudications by utilities and transportation commission: RCW 80.01.060.